Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,114
Retailer; records.

Every retailer shall prepare and maintain such records as the department reasonably requires with respect to inventories, receipts, purchases, and sales or other dispositions of compressed fuel. The records required by this section shall be retained for a minimum period of three years or for five years if the required returns or reports are not filed and shall be available at all reasonable times for audit and examination by the department to determine liability for the payment of the taxes and penalties under the Compressed Fuel Tax Act.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 18.